lexc/adj/enhuadja.lexc
LEXICON Caseat1
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez12§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Acc:^+cAcc^§AA§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig
                            Ik;

! uses Fam, etc of Tocase
Lexicon AddAdjvolt
[stem]+Adj:0     Possvolt;

LEXICON Possvolt
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk

LEXICON AddAdjae
0:^+cMid§oeoebb§bb Tocase1;  !körkörösebbek nem körkörösebbök!
@U.ART.ABSENT@  Tocaseae;

! elmúlta Jnull, JPnull
Lexicon Tocaseae
[stem]+Adj:0     Possae;
[stem]+Adj:0     Plur;
[stem]+Adj:0     Fam;

LEXICON Possae
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE11§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE11§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^^§Jnull§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE11§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§Jnull§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JPnull§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JPnull§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JPnull§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JPnull§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JPnull§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JPnull§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam11;


!result
!legeslegkedvesebbet
!legeslegkedvesebben
!legkedvesebbet
!legkedvesebben
!kedvesebbet
!kedvesebben
!kedveset
!kedvesen

LEXICON Adj
múlt AddAdjae;
